District of Columbia statutes.
10-211

Determination of general policy; supervision of expenditures.

The Board shall determine all questions of general policy relating to public recreation in and for the District of Columbia, and shall supervise and direct expenditure of all appropriations and/or other funds made available to the Board.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 262, ch. 265, art. II, § 1
1981 Ed., § 8-211.
1973 Ed., § 8-208.
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.